California, session 20252026, AB1851.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:(a) Social and emotional learning is a critical component of student well-being, academic success, and long-term public safety.(b) The California Department of Education has established “California’s Social and Emotional Learning Guiding Principles” that emphasize trauma-informed, evidence-based approaches to teaching and learning.(c) Tier 1 supports, including universal prevention, early intervention, and positive behavioral strategies, are effective in promoting mental health and reducing later system involvement.(d) Schools are uniquely positioned to provide consistent, preventive supports to children and youth before mental health challenges escalate.(e) The Legislature has already appropriated funds to support children and youth behavioral health initiatives and intends for those funds to be used efficiently and equitably.SEC. 2.It is the intent of the Legislature to do all of the following:(a)Establish a statewide Tier 1 Social and Emotional Learning framework aligned with existing California Department of Education standards.(b)Promote early intervention and prevention of behavioral health challenges.(c)Reduce disciplinary disparities and long-term justice system involvement.(d)Use existing behavioral health funding without creating a new entitlement.SEC. 3.Article 15 (commencing with Section 49591) is added to Chapter 9 of Part 27 of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Education Code, to read:15.The Shaw–Scott Children and Youth Behavioral Health and Social Emotional Learning Guidance49591.(a)(1)On or before July 1, 2027, the department shall develop and publish guidance, resources, and technical assistance to support local educational agencies in implementing an integrated, universal Tier 1 approach to social and emotional learning, behavioral health, and restorative practices for pupils in kindergarten and any of grades 1 to 12, inclusive, as part of a comprehensive Multi-Tiered System of Supports (MTSS).(2)The guidance developed pursuant to paragraph (1) shall be developed in consultation with experts in the field, including California’s statewide community of practice, with emphasized collaboration from the statewide social and emotional learning network of all 58 counties of participating county offices of education, and CalHOPE.(3)The guidance developed pursuant to paragraph (1) shall fit within existing school systems, including, but not limited to, MTSS and Positive Behavioral Interventions and Supports (PBIS), and shall promote safe, inclusive, and supportive learning environments.(4)The guidance developed pursuant to paragraph (1) shall include strategies to support meaningful engagement of pupils, families, educators, and community partners in fostering a positive school climate, strengthening relationships, and promoting a culture of belonging.(b)The guidance developed pursuant to subdivision (a) shall align with all of the following:(1)The department’s “California’s Social and Emotional Learning Guiding Principles.”(2)Evidence-based, trauma-informed practices.(3)The department’s “Transformative Social and Emotional Learning Competencies and Conditions for Thriving.”(4)Existing statewide frameworks, including MTSS and PBIS.(5)Instructional continuity plans developed pursuant to Section 49428.2 and related statewide efforts established under Senate Bill 153 (Chapter 38 of the Statutes of 2024).(6)Culturally responsive practices that support pupil identity, agency, and belonging.(c)Tier 1 supports shall prioritize universal prevention, early intervention, and the reduction of exclusionary discipline. Tier 1 supports may include, but are not limited to, all of the following:(1)Social and emotional learning instruction that is integrated across kindergarten and grades 1 to 12, inclusive.(2)Coping and stress-management skills.(3)Positive behavior and relationship development, including relationship-centered practices that promote connection, trust, and belonging.(4)Restorative justice practices.(5)Early identification and referral pathways.(6)Developmentally appropriate supports that emphasize early intervention for younger pupils.(7)Culturally responsive and trauma-informed practices.(d)(1)A school district or county office of education shall implement the guidance developed pursuant to subdivision (a), to the extent of available funding. Implementation pursuant to this subdivision shall emphasize coherence across all 58 counties and alignment with existing frameworks, rather than the adoption of discrete or stand-alone programs.(2)A charter school may implement the guidance developed pursuant to subdivision (a).(3)School districts, county offices of education, and charter schools are encouraged to begin implementation in the 2027–28 school year. Full implementation shall be phased in over a period of no less than three years, contingent upon local capacity and available funding.(e)(1)A school district or county office of education shall, to the extent of available funding, provide professional development to support implementation required by subdivision (d). Professional development shall be made available to certificated and classified staff and shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following:(A)Social and emotional learning integration.(B)Trauma-informed practices.(C)Child and adolescent development.(D)Relationship-centered and restorative approaches.(E)Culturally responsive practices.(2)At least 60 percent of schoolsite staff shall participate in professional development opportunities provided pursuant to this subdivision over the course of implementation.(f)Local educational agencies are encouraged to assess school climate, condition for pupil and educator well-being, and the effectiveness of Tier 1 supports using existing or locally developed tools, including, but not limited to, the California Healthy Kids Survey or other validated measures, to inform continuous improvement.(g)The department shall identify, monitor, and support existing social and emotional learning implementation sites and learning hubs to collect and analyze data, evaluate outcomes, and guide continuous improvement and statewide scaling. The department shall establish metrics and processes to assess, at a minimum, measurable shifts in school climate and conditions for thriving, the extent to which practices are integrated into school culture and systems, and improvements in adult development capacity, pupil life skills, and the development of proactive skills, behaviors, and attitudes.(h)Implementation of this section shall be contingent upon an appropriation in the annual Budget Act or another statute, including, but not limited to, funding made available through the Behavioral Health Services Act or other ongoing funding sources.SEC. 2. Section 41491 is added to the Education Code, immediately following Section 41490, to read:41491. (a) On or before July 1, 2027, the department shall enter into a contract with one or more local educational agencies, which shall have capacity and established expertise in providing resources, technical assistance, and training to local educational agencies, to serve as lead entities in providing support for the implementation of integrated, universal social-emotional learning, behavioral health, and restorative practices for pupils in kindergarten and grades 1 to 12, inclusive.(b) On or before January 1, 2028, the local educational agencies selected by the department, pursuant to a competitive process to be lead entities, as described in subdivision (a), shall make available guidance, resources, and technical assistance to local educational agencies to expand the statewide implementation of integrated, universal social-emotional learning, behavioral health, and restorative practices to meet the needs of pupils in their school communities.(c) The lead entities shall ensure that guidance, resources, and technical assistance provided pursuant to subdivision (b) are equity focused and include trauma-informed and culturally responsive practices as part of a comprehensive multitiered system of supports.(d) For purposes of this section, “local educational agency” means a school district, county office of education, or charter school.(e) Implementation of this section shall be contingent upon an appropriation of funds for purposes of this section in the annual Budget Act or another statute.